Idaho, session 2026, S1430.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-3302J, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-3302J. PREEMPTION OF FIREARMS REGULATION. (1) The legislature
finds that uniform laws regulating firearms are necessary to protect the
individual citizen's right to bear arms guaranteed by amendment 2 of the
United States Constitution and section 11, article I of the constitution of
the state of Idaho. It is the legislature's intent to wholly occupy the field
of firearms regulation within this state.
(2) Except as expressly authorized by state statute, no county, city,
agency, board or any other political subdivision of this state may adopt or
enforce any law, rule, regulation, or ordinance, executive order, or policy
which regulates in any manner the sale, acquisition, transfer, ownership,
possession, transportation, carrying or storage of firearms or any element
relating to firearms and components thereof, including ammunition. Any such
law, rule, regulation, ordinance, executive order, or policy shall be void,
unenforceable, and subject to a permanent injunction against the political
subdivision, as provided in subsection (7) of this section. It shall not be a
defense to a violation of this subsection that the political subdivision was
acting in good faith or on the advice of counsel.
(3) A county may adopt ordinances to regulate, restrict or prohibit the
discharge of firearms within its boundaries. Ordinances adopted under this
subsection may not apply to or affect:
(a) A person discharging a firearm in the lawful defense of person or
persons or property;
(b) A person discharging a firearm in the course of lawful hunting;
(c) A landowner and guests of the landowner discharging a firearm, when
the discharge will not endanger persons or property;
(d) A person lawfully discharging a firearm on a sport shooting range as
defined in section 55-2604, Idaho Code; or
(e) A person discharging a firearm in the course of target shooting on
public land if the discharge will not endanger persons or property.
(4) A city may adopt ordinances to regulate, restrict or prohibit the
discharge of firearms within its boundaries. Ordinances adopted under this
subsection may not apply to or affect:
(a) A person discharging a firearm in the lawful defense of person or
persons or property; or


(b) A person lawfully discharging a firearm on a sport shooting range as
defined in section 55-2604, Idaho Code.
(5) This section shall not be construed to affect:
(a) The authority of the department of fish and game to make rules or
regulations concerning the management of any wildlife of this state, as
set forth in section 36-104, Idaho Code; and
(b) The authority of counties and cities to regulate the location and
construction of sport shooting ranges, subject to the limitations con-
tained in chapter 26, title 55, Idaho Code.
(6) Any county, city, agency, board, or any other political subdivision
of this state that willfully and knowingly violates the provisions of this
section shall be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
per violation.
(7) The attorney general or any person or organization whose membership
is adversely affected by a law, rule, regulation, ordinance, executive or-
der, or policy that violates the provisions of this section may maintain an
action for damages, declaratory relief, or permanent injunctive relief. The
plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable costs and attorney's fees upon pre-
vailing or if the law, rule, regulation, ordinance, executive order, or pol-
icy is repealed or rescinded after the action was filed but prior to a final
determination by the court. Any person or organization who wishes to main-
tain an action pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall, prior to
filing, provide advanced written notice to the attorney general who shall
have thirty (30) days to investigate if a violation has occurred. If a viola-
tion is found, the attorney general shall notify the offending jurisdiction
that it has thirty (30) days to cure the violation, and if the jurisdiction
fails to do so within thirty (30) days, the cause of action may proceed.
(6) (8) The provisions of this section are hereby declared to be sever-
able. And if any provision is declared invalid for any reason, such declara-
tion shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.